District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-4436

Domestic company real-estate holdings.

Repealed.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1153, Ch. 672, ch. III, § 36
June 19, 1948, 62 Stat. 480, ch. 503

History

1973 Ed., § 35-536.

Prior Codifications